Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article IV, section 17, will read: new text end Sec. 17. deleted text begin No law shalldeleted text end new text begin A law must notnew text end embrace more than one subject, which deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be expressed in its title.new text begin Each provision in a law must be directly and logically related to the single subject stated in the title. When determining whether a law embraces more than one subject, the court must narrowly construe what constitutes a direct and logical relation to the single subject.new text end new text begin On a bill's passage through either house of the legislature, a bill must not be amended in a manner that changes the original purpose of the bill. When determining whether an enacted bill serves the original purpose of the bill, the original purpose of the bill must be narrowly construed. new text end new text begin A Minnesota resident may bring an action alleging a violation of this section in district court without needing to demonstrate direct injury. If a provision in a law is deemed unconstitutional pursuant to this section, the act is void and unenforceable and the offending provision is not severable. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. If ratified, the amendment is effective the day following ratification. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to require each provision in a law be directly and logically related to a single subject; to prohibit a bill from being amended in a way that changes the original purpose of the bill; to require the new section to be narrowly construed; to allow a Minnesota resident to allege a violation; and to provide that if a law is unconstitutional under the new section, the entire law is void and unenforceable? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) The title required under Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) must be: "Single Subject and Title Clause; Original Purpose." new text end Sec. 3. new text begin STATEMENT OF PURPOSE AND INTENT.new text end new text begin The legislature finds that the constitutional amendment proposed by this act furthers the important public interest of promoting public transparency by strengthening the single subject and title clause and by adding an original purpose clause. Moreover, the legislature finds that it is necessary to provide guidance on interpretation to the courts and to provide enforcement mechanisms. new text end new text begin The legislature finds that the practice of using omnibus bills with hundreds or thousands of provisions on multiple topics under the umbrellas of overly general titles is the antithesis of public transparency and has pushed the use of the single subject clause to the breaking point. The courts have infrequently found laws to be in violation of the single subject and title clauses, and have given deference to the legislature and its authority to act as an independent branch of government. The court has looked for and used "mere filaments" to string together pieces of a law into a single subject. The legislature finds that this deference and liberal construction provided by the court is no longer appropriate or desirable. The legislature intends to hold itself to a higher standard and to pass bills that are tightly related to a single subject and to define what constitutes a single subject narrowly. A single subject is one that has a direct and logical connection to a clearly articulated subject that is stated in the title of the bill. new text end new text begin Further, the legislature finds that it undermines the goal of public transparency when the legislature amends a bill so that the bill deviates from its original purpose. To remedy this, the legislature determines that each bill must not deviate from its original purpose as the bill moves through the legislative process in the senate and house of representatives. By requiring a bill to remain true to its original purpose, it will allow the public to know the unchanging purpose of the bill throughout the entire legislative process. Further, this requirement will curtail practices that are not in the interest of public transparency, including but not limited to the practice of using a bill as a vehicle for amendments where the bill and amendments do not share the same original purpose; amending multiple omnibus bills onto a single bill where the bills do not all share the same original purpose; and combining bills and amendments with different original purposes in order to garner support for the bill. The legislature further finds that when determining what constitutes the original purpose of a bill, the legislature intends that the court will narrowly construe the original purpose of the bill. At the same time, the legislature does not intend to unreasonably hinder the legislative process by preventing amendments or substantive changes to a bill, so long as those amendments and changes remain true to the original purpose. new text end new text begin The legislature will diligently strive to meet the constitutional requirements of this act and to promote the public transparency interests associated with the requirements. The legislature intends to pass bills that include only provisions that are directly and logically related to the single subject in the title. Further, as a bill moves through the legislative process in both bodies of the legislature, the legislature intends that it will not amend the bill in such a way that the original purpose of that bill is changed. If the legislature fails at these goals, the legislature intends that the court will narrowly construe the single subject and title clause and the original purpose clause in favor of public transparency. new text end